Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 1 URBAN RENEWAL
31-25-105.5. Acquisition of private property by eminent domain by authority for subsequent transfer to private party - restrictions - exceptions - right of civil action - damages - definitions.

Except as provided in this subsection (1) or subsection (2) of this section, no private property acquired by eminent domain by an authority pursuant to section 31-25-105 (1)(e) after June 4, 2004, shall be subsequently transferred to a private party unless:

The owner of the property consents in writing to acquisition of the property by eminent domain by the authority;

The governing body of the authority determines that the property is no longer necessary for the purpose for which it was originally acquired, and the authority first offers to sell the property to the owner from whom it was acquired, if the owner can be located, at a price not more than that paid by the authority and the owner of the property declines to exercise such right of first refusal;

The property acquired by the authority has been abandoned; or

The owner of the property requests or pleads in an eminent domain action that the authority acquiring the property also acquire property that is not essential to the purpose of the acquisition on the basis that acquiring less property would leave the owner of the property holding an uneconomic remnant.

Where a proposed transfer of private property acquired by an authority by eminent domain does not satisfy one of the requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section, such property acquired by eminent domain by an authority after June 4, 2004, may be subsequently transferred to a private party only upon satisfaction of each of the following conditions:

The governing body has made a determination that the property is located in a blighted area or the property itself is blighted, and the urban renewal project for which the property is being acquired shall be commenced no later than seven years from the date the blight determination is made. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a particular area or property is blighted shall be based upon reasonably current information obtained at the time the blight determination is made.

Not later than the commencement of the negotiation of an agreement for redevelopment or rehabilitation of property acquired or to be acquired by eminent domain, the authority provides notice and invites proposals for redevelopment or rehabilitation from all property owners, residents, and owners of business concerns located on the property acquired or to be acquired by eminent domain in the urban renewal area by mailing notice to their last known address of record. The authority may also at the same time invite proposals for redevelopment or rehabilitation from other interested persons who may not be property owners, owners of business concerns, or residents within the urban renewal area, and may provide public notice thereof by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation within the municipality in which the authority has been established.

In the case of a set of parcels to be acquired by the authority in connection with an urban renewal project, at least one of which is owned by an owner refusing or rejecting an agreement for the acquisition of the entire set of parcels, the authority makes a determination that the redevelopment or rehabilitation of the remaining parcels is not viable under the urban renewal plan without the parcel at issue.

Any owner of property located within the urban renewal area may challenge the determination of blight made by the governing body pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) by filing, not later than thirty days after the date the determination of blight is made, a civil action in district court for the county in which the property is located pursuant to C.R.C.P. 106 (a)(4) for judicial review of the exercise of discretion on the part of the governing body in making the determination of blight. Any such action shall be governed in accordance with the procedures and other requirements specified in the rule; except that the governing body shall have the burden of proving that, in making its determination of blight, it has neither exceeded its jurisdiction nor abused its discretion.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any determination made by the governing body pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be deemed a legislative determination and shall not be deemed a quasi-judicial determination.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no transfer that satisfies the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall be subject to the provisions of this subsection (2), subsection (3) or (4), or paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of this section.

Any authority seeking to acquire property by eminent domain in accordance with the requirements of subsection (2) of this section shall reimburse the owner of the property for reasonable attorney fees incurred by the owner in connection with the acquisition where the owner is the prevailing party on a challenge brought under paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section.

Any authority that exercises the power of eminent domain to transfer acquired property to another private party as authorized in accordance with the requirements of this section shall adopt relocation assistance and land acquisition policies to benefit displaced persons that are consistent with those set forth in article 56 of title 24, C.R.S., to the extent applicable to the facts of each specific property, and, at the time of the relocation of the owner or the occupant, shall provide compensation or other forms of assistance to any displaced person in accordance with such policies. In addition, in the case of a business concern displaced by the acquisition of property by eminent domain, the authority shall make a business interruption payment to the business concern not to exceed the lesser of ten thousand dollars or one-fourth of the average annual taxable income shown on the three most recent federal income tax returns of the business concern.

In any case where the acquisition of property by eminent domain by an authority displaces individuals, families, or business concerns, the authority shall make reasonable efforts to relocate such individuals, families, or business concerns within the urban renewal area, where such relocation is consistent with the uses provided in the urban renewal plan, or in areas within reasonable proximity of, or comparable to, the original location of such individuals, families, or business concerns.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Blighted area" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 31-25-103 (2); except that, for purposes of this section only, "blighted area" means an area that, in its present condition and use and, by reason of the presence of at least five of the factors specified in section 31-25-103 (2)(a) to (2)(l), substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of the municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations, or constitutes an economic or social liability, and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare.

"Private property" or "property" means, as applied to real property, only a fee ownership interest.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1742, § 1, effective June 4.

31-25-105.7. Condemnation actions by authorities - effect of other provisions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any condemnation action commenced by an authority on or after June 6, 2006, shall satisfy the requirements specified in section 38-1-101, C.R.S. To the extent there is any conflict between the provisions of this part 1 and the provisions of section 38-1-101, C.R.S., the provisions of section 38-1-101, C.R.S., shall control.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1750, § 2, effective June 6.

31-25-106. Disposal of property in urban renewal area.

An authority may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest therein acquired by it as a part of an urban renewal project for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use in accordance with the urban renewal plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions, including covenants running with the land (and including the incorporation by reference therein of the provisions of an urban renewal plan or any part thereof), as it deems to be in the public interest or necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 1. The purchasers, lessees, transferees, and their successors and assigns are obligated to devote such real property only to the land uses, designs, building requirements, timing, or procedure specified in the urban renewal plan and may be obligated to comply with such other requirements as the authority may determine to be in the public interest, including the obligation to begin within a reasonable time any improvements on such real property required by the urban renewal plan. Such real property or interest shall be sold, leased, or otherwise transferred at not less than its fair value (as determined by the authority) for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan. In determining the fair value of real property for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan, an authority shall take into account and give consideration to the uses provided in such plan; the restrictions upon and the covenants, conditions, and obligations assumed by the purchaser or lessee; and the objectives of such plan for the prevention of the recurrence of slum or blighted areas. Real property acquired by an authority which, in accordance with the provisions of the urban renewal plan, is to be transferred shall be transferred as rapidly as feasible in the public interest consistent with the carrying out of the provisions of the urban renewal plan. Any contract for such transfer and the urban renewal plan (or such part of such contract or plan as the authority may determine) may be recorded in the land records of the county in such manner as to afford actual or constructive notice thereof.

An authority may dispose of real property in an urban renewal area to private persons only under such reasonable competitive bidding procedures as it shall prescribe or as provided in this subsection (2). An authority, by public notice by publication once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality, prior to the execution of any contract to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property and prior to the delivery of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under the provisions of this section, may invite proposals from and make available all pertinent information to any person interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate an urban renewal area or any part thereof. Such notice shall identify the area, or portion thereof, and shall state that such further information as is available may be obtained at the office designated in the notice. The authority shall consider all such redevelopment or rehabilitation proposals and the financial and legal ability of the persons making such proposals to carry them out and may negotiate with any persons for proposals for the purchase, lease, or other transfer of any real property acquired by the authority in the urban renewal area. The authority may accept such proposal as it deems to be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of this part 1; except that a notification of intention to accept such proposal shall be filed with the governing body not less than fifteen days prior to any such acceptance. Thereafter, the authority may execute such contract in accordance with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section and deliver deeds, leases, and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate such contract.

An authority may temporarily operate and maintain real property acquired in an urban renewal area pending the disposition of the property for redevelopment without regard to the provisions of subsection (1) of this section for such uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in conformity with the urban renewal plan.

Anything in subsection (1) of this section to the contrary notwithstanding, project real property may be set aside, dedicated, and devoted by the authority to public uses which are in accordance with the urban renewal plan or set aside, dedicated, and transferred by the authority to the municipality or to any other appropriate public body for public uses which are in accordance with such urban renewal plan, with or without compensation for such property and with or without regard to the fair value thereof as determined in subsection (1) of this section, upon or subject to such terms, conditions, covenants, restrictions, or limitations as the authority deems to be in the public interest and as are not inconsistent with the purposes and objectives and the other applicable provisions of this part 1.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1165, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-25-106 as it existed prior to 1975.